Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 1. Declarations.

Sec. 39.52.010.
Declaration of policy.

It is declared that

high moral and ethical standards among public officers in the executive branch are essential to assure the trust, respect, and confidence of the people of this state;

a code of ethics for the guidance of public officers will

discourage those officers from acting upon personal or financial interests in the performance of their public responsibilities;

improve standards of public service; and

promote and strengthen the faith and confidence of the people of this state in their public officers;

holding public office or employment is a public trust and that as one safeguard of that trust, the people require public officers to adhere to a code of ethics;

a fair and open government requires that executive branch public officers conduct the public’s business in a manner that preserves the integrity of the governmental process and avoids conflicts of interest;

in order for the rules governing conduct to be respected both during and after leaving public service, the code of ethics must be administered fairly without bias or favoritism;

no code of conduct, however comprehensive, can anticipate all situations in which violations may occur nor can it prescribe behaviors that are appropriate to every situation; in addition, laws and regulations regarding ethical responsibilities cannot legislate morality, eradicate corruption, or eliminate bad judgment; and

compliance with a code of ethics is an individual responsibility; thus all who serve the state have a solemn responsibility to avoid improper conduct and prevent improper behavior by colleagues and subordinates.

The legislature declares that it is the policy of the state, when a public employee is appointed to serve on a state board or commission, that the holding of such offices does not constitute the holding of incompatible offices unless expressly prohibited by the Alaska Constitution, this chapter and any opinions or decisions rendered under it, or another statute.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986; am § 80 ch 74 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For disqualification of board member or hearing officer, see 22 AAC 20, art. 14.